Utah statutes.
4-31-109.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules concerning brucellosis, trichomoniasis, and tuberculosis in livestock.

(1)  The department may:

(a)  make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to control and eradicate brucellosis, trichomoniasis, and tuberculosis in livestock; and

(b)  enforce the rules described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The department shall, in making the rules described in Subsection (1)(a), protect against negative impact on the interstate or intrastate commerce of livestock that is transferred, sold, or exhibited.



Enacted by Chapter 331, 2012 General Session

